Hawaii statutes.
§469-5 Disposition of fees. All fees
collected by the board shall be deposited by the department of health with the
director of finance to the credit of the general fund. [L 1933, c 36, §4; RL
1935, §1453; RL 1945, §3055; RL 1955, §72-5; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 19; am
L 1961, c 184, §16; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §469-5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next